Illinois, session 104th, HB4760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Construction Site Temporary Restroom 5Facility Act is amended by changing Sections 1, 5, 10, 15, and 620 and by adding Section 10.5 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 37/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 9Construction Site Temporary Restroom Facility and Sanitary 10Conditions for Menstruation and Lactation Act.11(Source: P.A. 94-42, eff. 6-17-05.) 12    (410 ILCS 37/5)13    Sec. 5. Legislative finding. It has been established by 14scientific evidence that improper plumbing can result in the 15introduction of pathogenic organisms into the potable water 16supply, result in the escape of toxic gases into the 17environment, and result in potentially lethal disease and 18epidemic. It is further found that minimum numbers of plumbing 19facilities and fixtures are necessary for the comfort and 20convenience of workers and persons in public places and that 21individuals who are employed on construction sites and who are 22menstruating, lactating, or both need additional support from   HB4760- 2 -LRB104 18656 TRT 32099 b1their employers to ensure work site safety and a construction 2industry that is inclusive of all workers.3(Source: P.A. 94-42, eff. 6-17-05.) 4    (410 ILCS 37/10)5    Sec. 10. Temporary restroom facility. The owner or the 6owner's representative of a temporary building or building 7under construction, that is not yet occupied for its intended 8purpose, shall ensure that employees working on the 9construction site have access to restroom facilities that 10which meet the following requirements:11        (1) Toileting facilities shall be enclosed and 12    discharged into a sanitary sewer. In lieu of connecting to 13    a sewer, the sanitary facility may be a portable, 14    enclosed, chemically-treated tank-tight unit.15        (2) If a woman or an individual who menstruates is 16    present on the work site and there are 10 or more workers 17    of any gender at the work site, then a separate toilet 18    facility shall be provided at the work site and designated 19    for use by women and individuals who menstruate individual 20    portable units are used, separate toileting facilities are 21    not required for males and females. Otherwise, toileting 22    Toileting facilities shall be provided based on the 23    Occupational Safety and Health Administration construction 24    sanitation standards, which are as follows:25            (A) For 20 employees or less, one toilet facility   HB4760- 3 -LRB104 18656 TRT 32099 b1        shall be provided. 2            (B) For 20 employees or more, one toilet facility 3        and one urinal per 40 workers shall be provided.4            (C) For 200 or more employees, one toilet facility 5        and one urinal per 50 workers shall be provided. 6        (3) Hand cleansing units shall be provided.7        (4) All non-sewered units shall be pumped and cleansed 8    regularly to ensure adequate working facilities.9        (5) For non-residential temporary buildings or 10    non-residential buildings, the restroom facilities shall 11    be located within 300 feet of the entrance of the building 12    under construction. 13        (6) For residential temporary buildings or residential 14    buildings, the restroom facilities shall be made readily 15    available in nearby areas. 16(Source: P.A. 94-42, eff. 6-17-05.) 17    (410 ILCS 37/10.5 new)18    Sec. 10.5. Sanitary conditions for construction workers 19who menstruate, express milk, or both. 20    (a) Employers in the construction industry shall provide 21their workers who menstruate and are performing construction 22activities on a work site with the following minimum sanitary 23conditions:24        (1) access, on the work site, either to:25            (A) a minimum size bathroom that is equivalent to   HB4760- 4 -LRB104 18656 TRT 32099 b1        a standard sized portable chemical toilet and can be 2        secured with a latch upon entry; or3            (B) a permanent structure with a bathroom with 4        toileting facilities that can be secured with a latch 5        upon entry;6        (2) an adequate amount of time to accommodate for 7    multiple layers of clothing while using the bathroom; and8        (3) a sufficient amount or supply of menstrual hygiene 9    products that are available at no cost to the workers and 10    are:11            (A) located in all gender-neutral bathrooms, for 12        work sites with fewer than 10 workers;13            (B) located in bathrooms designated for workers 14        who menstruate, for work sites with 10 or more 15        workers; or16            (C) provided in kits for each employee who needs 17        the products.18    As used in this subsection (a), "a sufficient amount or 19supply of menstrual hygiene products" means at least 10 units 20of the products. 21    (c) Employers in the construction industry shall provide 22their workers who are lactating and performing construction 23activities on a work site with reasonable accommodations upon 24request as needed to express breast milk. Minimum reasonable 25accommodations shall comply with this Section and the Nursing 26Mothers in the Workplace Act. Reasonable accommodations under   HB4760- 5 -LRB104 18656 TRT 32099 b1this Section may include:2        (1) a flexible work schedule, including scheduling 3    breaks that provide time for expressing breast milk;4        (2) a location, other than the bathroom, that is 5    convenient and sanitary for the employee to express breast 6    milk and that is private and lockable from the inside;7        (3) convenient hygienic refrigeration on the work site 8    for the storage of milk; and9        (4) a convenient water source for the employee to 10    clean and wash hands and milk expression equipment. The 11    water source must be in a private location near the 12    location where the breast milk is expressed.13    (d) On multiemployer work sites, each employer is 14responsible for ensuring that facilities for their own 15employees are provided.16    (e) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Public 17Health shall provide guidance to employers on reasonable 18accommodations under this Section. 19    (410 ILCS 37/15)20    Sec. 15. Enforcement. Inspectors employed by 21municipalities and counties may inspect construction sites to 22ensure compliance with this Act. Employees of construction 23sites may call the certified local public health agency with 24jurisdiction over that construction site to request an 25inspection if noncompliance with this Act is suspected.   HB4760- 6 -LRB104 18656 TRT 32099 b1Retaliation by employers is prohibited. 2(Source: P.A. 94-42, eff. 6-17-05.) 3    (410 ILCS 37/20)4    Sec. 20. Penalty. 5    (a) Any owner who fails or refuses to comply with the 6provisions of this Act shall be deemed guilty of a petty 7offense and shall be issued a fine as determined by the 8certified local public health agency.9    (b) Any owner convicted of violating the provisions of 10this Act shall be subject to a conviction for succeeding 11offenses for each day he or she fails or refuses to comply with 12the provisions of this Act. 13(Source: P.A. 94-42, eff. 6-17-05.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.